Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-446
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 67-446 to 67-453:

(1) General partner means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership;

(2) Limited partner means a limited partner in a limited partnership;

(3) Limited partnership means a limited partnership created under the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction; and

(4) Partner includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 46.

Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, see section 67-296.